North Carolina statutes. Chapter 32A. Powers of Attorney.
Article 3. Health Care Powers of Attorney.

§ 32A-15.
General purpose of this Article.

The General Assembly recognizes as a matter of public policy the fundamental right of an individual to control the decisions relating to his or her medical care, and that this right may be exercised on behalf of the individual by an agent chosen by the individual.

The purpose of this Article is to establish an additional, nonexclusive method for an individual to exercise his or her right to give, withhold, or withdraw consent to medical treatment, including mental health treatment, when the individual lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate health care decisions.

This Article is intended and shall be construed to be consistent with the provisions of Article 23 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes provided that in the event of a conflict between the provisions of this Article and Article 23 of Chapter 90, the provisions of Article 23 of Chapter 90 control. No conflict between these Chapters exists when either a health care power of attorney or a declaration provides that the declaration is subject to decisions of a health care agent. If no declaration has been executed by the principal as provided in G.S. 90-321 that expressly covers the principal’s present condition and if the health care agent has been given the specific authority in a health care power of attorney to authorize the withholding or discontinuing of life-prolonging measures when the principal is in such condition, the measures may be withheld or discontinued as provided in the health care power of attorney upon the direction and under the supervision of the attending physician, as G.S. 90-322 shall not apply in such case. Nothing in this Article shall be construed to authorize any affirmative or deliberate act or omission to end life other than to permit the natural process of dying.

This Article is intended and shall be construed to be consistent with the provisions of Part 3A of Article 16 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this Article and Part 3A of Article 16 of Chapter 130A, the provisions of Part 3A of Article 16 of Chapter 130A control.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1; 1993, c. 523, s. 1; 1998-198, s. 1; 1998-217, s. 53; 2007-502, s. 1; 2008-153, s. 4.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1993, c. 523, which amended this section, in s. 4 provides that powers of attorney made before October 1, 1993, remain in full force and effect.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-502, s. 1, effective October 1, 2007, rewrote subsection (c).

Session Laws 2008-153, s. 4, effective August 2, 2008, substituted “Part 3A” for “Part 3” three times in subsection (d).

Legal Periodicals.

For survey on living wills, see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 2108 (1992).

For comment on the standard of mental capacity in North Carolina for legal transactions of the elderly, see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 563 (1997).

For article, “Limiting a Surrogate’s Authority to Terminate Life-Support for An Incompetent Adult,” see 79 N.C.L. Rev. 1815 (2001).

For comment, “Compensating Post-Conception Prenatal Medical Malpractice While Respecting Life: A Recommendation to North Carolina Legislators,” see 29 Campbell L. Rev. 761 (2007).

§ 32A-16.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Disposition of remains. — The decision to bury or cremate human remains, as human remains are defined in G.S. 90-210.121, and, subject to

G.S. 32A-19(b)

, arrangements relating to burial or cremation.

(1a)

Health care. — Any care, treatment, service, or procedure to maintain, diagnose, treat, or provide for the principal’s physical or mental health or personal care and comfort including life-prolonging measures. “Health care” includes mental health treatment as defined in subdivision (8) of this section.

Health care agent. — The person appointed as a health care attorney-in-fact.

Health care power of attorney. — Except as provided in

G.S. 32A-16.1

, a written instrument that substantially meets the requirements of this Article, that is signed in the presence of two qualified witnesses, and acknowledged before a notary public, pursuant to which an attorney-in-fact or agent is appointed to act for the principal in matters relating to the health care of the principal. The notary who takes the acknowledgement may but is not required to be a paid employee of the attending physician or mental health treatment provider, a paid employee of a health facility in which the principal is a patient, or a paid employee of a nursing home or any adult care home in which the principal resides.

Life-prolonging measures. — Medical procedures or interventions which in the judgment of the attending physician would serve only to postpone artificially the moment of death by sustaining, restoring, or supplanting a vital function, including mechanical ventilation, dialysis, antibiotics, artificial nutrition and hydration, and similar forms of treatment. Life-prolonging measures do not include care necessary to provide comfort or to alleviate pain.

Principal. — The person making the health care power of attorney.

Qualified witness. — Except as provided in

G.S. 32A-16.1

, a witness in whose presence the principal has executed the health care power of attorney, who believes the principal to be of sound mind, and who states that he or she (i) is not related within the third degree to the principal nor to the principal’s spouse, (ii) does not know nor have a reasonable expectation that he or she would be entitled to any portion of the estate of the principal upon the principal’s death under any existing will or codicil of the principal or under the Intestate Succession Act as it then provides, (iii) is not the attending physician or mental health treatment provider of the principal, nor a licensed health care provider who is a paid employee of the attending physician or mental health treatment provider, nor a paid employee of a health facility in which the principal is a patient, nor a paid employee of a nursing home or any adult care home in which the principal resides, and (iv) does not have a claim against any portion of the estate of the principal at the time of the principal’s execution of the health care power of attorney.

Advance instruction for mental health treatment or advance instruction. — As defined in G.S. 122C-72(1).

Mental health treatment. — The process of providing for the physical, emotional, psychological, and social needs of the principal for the principal’s mental illness. “Mental health treatment” includes electroconvulsive treatment, treatment of mental illness with psychotropic medication, and admission to and retention in a facility for care or treatment of mental illness.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1; 1998-198, s. 1; 1998-217, s. 53; 2005-351, s. 1; 2006-226, s. 32; 2007-502, s. 2; 2020-3, s. 4.10(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2020-3, s. 5, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-351, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws 2006-226, s. 32, effective October 1, 2005, and applicable to powers of attorney created on, before, or after that date, added present subdivision (1) and redesignated former subdivision (1) as subdivision (1a).

Session Laws 2007-502, s. 2, effective October 1, 2007, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.10(a), effective May 4, 2020, added the exceptions at the beginning of subdivisions (3) and (6).

§ 32A-16.1.
Health care powers of attorney executed during state of emergency.

The requirement of

G.S. 32A-16(3)

that a health care power of attorney be executed in the presence of two qualified witnesses shall be waived for all instruments executed on or after the effective date of this section and prior to termination of the state of emergency declared by Governor Roy Cooper in Executive Order No. 116, on March 10, 2020, as the same may be extended by any subsequent executive order, such that an instrument that is signed by the principal, properly acknowledged before a notary public, and otherwise executed in compliance with the provisions of this Article shall not be invalidated by the principal’s failure to execute the health care power of attorney in the presence of two qualified witnesses.

Health care powers of attorney executed without two qualified witnesses during the time period defined in subsection (a) of this section shall contain a short and plain statement indicating that the instrument was executed in accordance with the procedures of this section.

This section shall expire at 12:01 A.M. on August 1, 2020; provided, however, all instruments made in accordance with this section and while this section is in effect shall remain effective and shall not need to be reaffirmed.

History.

2020-3, s. 4.10(b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.10(e), made this section effective May 4, 2020.

Session Laws 2020-3, s. 5, is a severability clause.

§ 32A-17.
Who may make a health care power of attorney.

Any person having understanding and capacity to make and communicate health care decisions, who is 18 years of age or older, may make a health care power of attorney.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the standard of mental capacity in North Carolina for legal transactions of the elderly, see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 563 (1997).

§ 32A-18.
Who may act as a health care attorney-in-fact.

Any competent person who is not engaged in providing health care to the principal for remuneration, and who is 18 years of age or older, may act as a health care agent.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1.

§ 32A-19.
Extent of authority; limitations of authority.

A principal, pursuant to a health care power of attorney, may grant to the health care agent full power and authority to make health care decisions to the same extent that the principal could make those decisions for himself or herself if he or she had capacity to make and communicate health care decisions, including without limitation, the power to authorize withholding or discontinuing life-prolonging measures and the power to authorize the giving or withholding of mental health treatment. A health care power of attorney may also contain or incorporate by reference any lawful guidelines or directions relating to the health care of the principal as the principal deems appropriate.

(a1)

A health care power of attorney may incorporate or be combined with an advance instruction for mental health treatment prepared pursuant to Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes. A health care agent’s decisions about mental health treatment shall be consistent with any statements the principal has expressed in an advance instruction for mental health treatment if one so exists, and if none exists, shall be consistent with what the agent believes in good faith to be the manner in which the principal would act if the principal did not lack capacity to make or communicate health care decisions. A health care agent is not subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or professional disciplinary action for any action taken in good faith pursuant to an advance instruction for mental health treatment.

A health care power of attorney may authorize the health care agent to exercise any and all rights the principal may have with respect to anatomical gifts, the authorization of any autopsy, and the disposition of remains; provided this authority is limited to incurring reasonable costs related to exercising these powers, and a health care power of attorney does not give the health care agent general authority over a principal’s property or financial affairs.

A health care power of attorney may contain, and the authority of the health care agent shall be subject to, the specific limitations or restrictions as the principal deems appropriate.

The powers and authority granted to the health care agent pursuant to a health care power of attorney shall be limited to the matters addressed in it, and, except as necessary to exercise such powers and authority relating to health care, shall not confer any power or authority with respect to the property or financial affairs of the principal.

This Article shall not be construed to invalidate a power of attorney that authorizes an agent to make health care decisions for the principal, which was executed prior to October 1, 1991.

A health care power of attorney does not limit any authority in Article 5 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes either to take a person into custody or to admit, retain, or treat a person in a facility.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1; 1998-198, s. 1; 1998-217, s. 53; 2007-502, s. 3.

Editor’s Note.

This section was amended by Session Laws 1998-198, s. 1, in the coded bill drafting format provided by

G.S. 120-20.1

. The subsection designations have been set out above at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-502, s. 3, effective October 1, 2007, in subsection (a), deleted “understanding and” following “if he or she had” and substituted “life-prolonging measures” for “life-sustaining procedures”; deleted “sufficient understanding or” following “did not lack” in subsection (a1); inserted “provided this authority is limited to incurring reasonable costs related to exercising these powers, and a health care power of attorney does not give the health care agent general authority over a principal’s property or financial affairs” at the end of subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Aid in Dying in North Carolina,” see 97 N.C. L. Rev. Addendum 1 (2019).

§ 32A-20.
Effectiveness and duration; revocation.

A health care power of attorney shall become effective when and if the physician or physicians or, in the case of mental health treatment, physician or eligible psychologist as defined in G.S. 122C-3(13d), designated by the principal determine in writing that the principal lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate decisions relating to the health care of the principal, and shall continue in effect during the incapacity of the principal. The determination shall be made by the principal’s attending physician or eligible psychologist if the physician or physicians or eligible psychologist designated by the principal is unavailable or is otherwise unable or unwilling to make this determination or if the principal failed to designate a physician or physicians or eligible psychologist to make this determination. A health care power of attorney may include a provision that, if the principal does not designate a physician for reasons based on his religious or moral beliefs as specified in the health care power of attorney, a person designated by the principal in the health care power of attorney may certify in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, that the principal lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate decisions relating to his health care. The person so designated must be a competent person 18 years of age or older, not engaged in providing health care to the principal for remuneration, and must be a person other than the health care agent. For purposes of exercising authority described in

G.S. 32A-19(b)

, however, a health care power of attorney shall be effective following the death of the principal without regard to the principal’s understanding or capacity when the principal was living. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a principal from revoking a health care power of attorney.

Except for purposes of exercising authority granted by a health care power of attorney with respect to anatomical gifts, autopsy, or disposition of remains as provided in

G.S. 32A-19(b)

, a health care power of attorney is revoked by the death of the principal. A health care power of attorney may be revoked by the principal at any time, so long as the principal is capable of making and communicating health care decisions. The principal may exercise this right of revocation by executing and acknowledging an instrument of revocation, by executing and acknowledging a subsequent health care power of attorney, or in any other manner by which the principal is able to communicate an intent to revoke. This revocation becomes effective only upon communication by the principal to each health care agent named in the revoked health care power of attorney and to the principal’s attending physician or eligible psychologist.

The authority of a health care agent who is the spouse of the principal shall be revoked upon the entry by a court of a decree of divorce or separation between the principal and the health care agent; provided that if the health care power of attorney designates a successor health care agent, the successor shall serve as the health care agent, and the health care power of attorney shall not be revoked.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1; 1993, c. 523, s. 2; 1998-198, s. 1; 1998-217, s. 53; 2005-351, s. 2; 2006-226, s. 32; 2011-344, s. 10; 2012-18, s. 3.11.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1993, c. 523, which amended this section, in s. 4 provides that powers of attorney made before October 1, 1993 remain in full force and effect.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 10, added the last two sentences in subsection (a). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the standard of mental capacity in North Carolina for legal transactions of the elderly, see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 563 (1997).

§ 32A-21.
Appointment, resignation, removal, and substitution.

A health care power of attorney may contain provisions relating to the appointment, resignation, removal and substitution of the health care agent.

If all health care agents named in the instrument or substituted, die or for any reason fail or refuse to act, and all methods of substitution have been exhausted, the health care power of attorney shall cease to be effective.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1.

§ 32A-22.
Relation of the health care agent to a court-appointed fiduciary and to a general attorney-in-fact.

If, following the execution of a health care power of attorney, a court of competent jurisdiction appoints a guardian of the person of the principal, or a general guardian with powers over the person of the principal, the guardian may petition the court, after giving notice to the health care agent, to suspend the authority of the health care agent during the guardianship. The court may suspend the authority of the health care agent for good cause shown, provided that the court’s order must direct whether the guardian shall act consistently with the health care power of attorney or whether and in what respect the guardian may deviate from it. Any order suspending the authority of the health care agent must set forth the court’s findings of fact and conclusions of law. The guardian shall act consistently with G.S. 35A-1201(a)(5). A health care provider shall be fully protected from liability in relying on a health care power of attorney until given actual notice of the court’s order suspending the authority of the health care agent.

A principal may nominate, by a health care power of attorney, the guardian of the person of the principal if a guardianship proceeding is thereafter commenced. The court shall make its appointment in accordance with the principal’s most recent nomination in an unrevoked health care power of attorney, except for good cause shown.

The execution of a health care power of attorney shall not revoke, restrict or otherwise affect any nonhealth care powers granted by the principal to an attorney-in-fact pursuant to a general power of attorney; provided that the powers granted to the health care agent with respect to health care matters shall be superior to any similar powers granted by the principal to an attorney-in-fact under a general power of attorney.

A health care power of attorney may be combined with or incorporated into a general power of attorney which is executed in accordance with the requirements of this Article.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1; 1998-198, s. 1; 1998-217, s. 53; 2007-502, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-502, s. 4, effective October 1, 2007, rewrote subsection (a).

§ 32A-23.
Article 2, Chapter 32A, not applicable.

The provisions of Article 2 of this Chapter shall not be applicable to a health care power of attorney executed pursuant to this Article.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1.

§ 32A-24.
Reliance on health care power of attorney; defense.

Any physician or other health care provider involved in the medical care of the principal may rely upon the authority of the health care agent contained in a signed and acknowledged health care power of attorney in the absence of actual knowledge of revocation of the health care power of attorney. The physician or health care provider may rely upon a copy of the health care power of attorney obtained from the Advance Health Care Directive Registry maintained by the Secretary of State pursuant to Article 21 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes to the same extent that the individual may rely upon the original document.

All health care decisions made by a health care agent pursuant to a health care power of attorney during any period following a determination that the principal lacks understanding or capacity to make or communicate health care decisions shall have the same effect as if the principal were not incapacitated and were present and acting on his or her own behalf. Any health care provider relying in good faith on the authority of a health care agent shall be protected to the full extent of the power conferred upon the health care agent, and no person so relying on the authority of the health care agent shall be liable, by reason of his reliance, for actions taken pursuant to a decision of the health care agent.

The withholding or withdrawal of life-prolonging measures by or under the orders of a physician pursuant to the authorization of a health care agent shall not be considered suicide or the cause of death for any civil or criminal purpose nor shall it be considered unprofessional conduct or a lack of professional competence. Any person, institution or facility, including without limitation the health care agent and the attending physician, against whom criminal or civil liability is asserted because of conduct described in this section, may interpose this section as a defense.

The protections of this section extend to any valid health care power of attorney, including a document valid under

G.S. 32A-27

; these protections are not limited to health care powers of attorney prepared in accordance with the statutory form provided in

G.S. 32A-25.1

, or to health care powers of attorney filed with the Advance Health Care Directive Registry maintained by the Secretary of State. A health care provider may rely in good faith on an oral or written statement by legal counsel that a document appears to meet applicable statutory requirements for a health care power of attorney. These protections also extend to a document executed in another jurisdiction that is valid as a health care power of attorney under

G.S. 32A-27

. A health care provider shall have no liability for acting in accordance with a revoked health care power of attorney unless that provider has actual notice of the revocation.

History.

1991, c. 639, s. 1; 2001-455, s. 3; 2001-513, s. 30(b); 2007-502, ss. 5(a), (b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-502, ss. 5(a) and 5(b), effective October 1, 2007, substituted “life-prolonging measures” for “life-sustaining procedures” in subsection (c); added subsection (d).

§ 32A-25.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-502, s. 6(a), effective October 1, 2007.

Cross References.

As to current statutory form health care power of attorney, see

G.S. 32A-25.1

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-351, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2006-226, s. 32, effective October 1, 2005, and applicable to powers of attorney created on, before, or after that date, in paragraph 2. of the form, divided the former paragraph into two paragraphs, and added the exception at the end of the first paragraph; in paragraph 3. of the form, in sub-paragraph H, deleted “to donate my organs” following “purposes,” inserted “to make an anatomical gift of my organs or body, or part thereof,” and made minor punctuation changes; and in paragraph 4. of the form, added sub-paragraph D.